Utah statutes.
62A-15-711.   Standards for care and treatment.

Every child is entitled to humane care and treatment and to medical care and treatment in accordance with the prevailing standards accepted in medical practice, psychiatric nursing practice, social work practice, and the practice of clinical psychology.

